Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.030

Rules.

The superintendent shall have the power to promulgate such rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary to implement this chapter.

[ 1987 c 193 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.29.030.]